Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-445
Discrimination or retaliation prohibited; action for relief authorized.

(1) A health care facility or health care service shall not discriminate or retaliate against a person residing in, served by, or employed at such facility or service who has initiated or participated in any proceeding authorized by the Health Care Facility Licensure Act or who has presented a complaint or provided information to the administrator of such facility or service or the Department of Health and Human Services. Such person may maintain an action for any type of relief, including injunctive and declaratory relief, permitted by law.

(2) A health care facility licensed pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act shall not discriminate or retaliate against any person who has initiated or participated in the making of a report under the Uniform Credentialing Act to the department. Such person may maintain an action for any type of relief, including injunctive and declaratory relief, permitted by law.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 372;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 10.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.